New Jersey, session 222, A2020.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a pharmacist shall not interchange an anti-epileptic drug or formulation of an anti-epileptic drug, brand or generic, for the treatment of seizures associated with epilepsy without providing prior notification to, and obtaining the signed informed consent of, the prescribing physician and the patient, or the patients parent, legal guardian or spouse, as applicable. b.    As used in this act: Anti-epileptic drug means any drug prescribed for the treatment of epilepsy or a drug used to treat or prevent seizures. Epilepsy means a neurological condition characterized by recurrent seizures. Interchange means the substitution of one version of the same anti-epileptic therapeutic product, including a generic version for the prescribed brand, a brand version for the prescribed generic version, a generic version by one manufacturer for a generic version by a different manufacturer, a different formulation of the prescribed anti-epileptic drug, or a different anti-epileptic therapeutic drug product for the anti-epileptic product originally prescribed. Seizure means an acute clinical change secondary to a brief disturbance in the electrical activity of the brain. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month following the date of enactment.